scripts/reflexive.twolc
Alphabet

      G:0 P:0 L:0 D:0 I:0 Y:0 S:0  ! Udar Morphology

      %  ! space
      %-

      Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
      Ъ:0 Ь:0
      А   Е   Ё:О́ И О У Ы Э   Ю:У Я
      А́ А̂ Е́:Э́ Ё́   И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Э̂ Ю́:У́ Я́:А́
      А̀   Ѐ   Ё̀   Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀   Ю̀   Я̀

      б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
      ъ:0 ь:0
      а   е   ё:о́ и  о у ы э   ю:у я   ʌ
      а́ â е́:э́ ё́   и́  о́ у́ ы́ э́ э̂ ю́:у́ я́:а́ '    ! ё́ is included to broaden coverage
      а̀   ѐ   ё̀   ѝ  о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀   ю̀   я̀ ;

Sets

! Consonants
C = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
    б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

! Consonants, excluding { Ж ж Й й Ч ч Ш ш Щ щ Ц ц }
CNoSoftHard = Б В Г Д З К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х
              б в г д з к л м н п р с т ф х ;

! Unvoiced and paired consonants
UnvoicedPairedC = К П С Т Ф Ш
                  к п с т ф ш ;

! Voiced and paired consonants
VoicedPairedCNoB = Б Г Д Ж З
                   б г д ж з ;

! Soft consonants
SoftC = Й Ч Щ
        й ч щ ;

! Hard consonants
HardC = Ж Ц Ш
        ж ц ш ;

! Labials for Softness Assimilation
LAB = Б б В в М м П п Ф ф ;

! Dentals for Softness Assimilation
DEN = Д д З з Л л Н н Р р С с Т т Ц ц ;

! Velars for Softness Assimilation
VEL = Г г К к Х х ;

! Vowels
V = А Е Ё И О У Ы Э Ю Я
    А́ Е́ Ё́ И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
    А̀ Ѐ Ё̀ Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀ Ю̀ Я̀
    а е ё и о у ы э ю я
    а́ е́ ё́ и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́
    а̀ ѐ ё̀ ѝ о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀ ю̀ я̀ ;

! Stressed vowels
StressedV = А́ Е́ Ё́ Ё И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
            а́ е́ ё́ ё и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́ ;

! Unstressed vowels
UnstressedV = А Е И О У Ы Э Ю Я
              а е и о у ы э ю я ;

! Vowels that indicate softness
SoftV = Е Ё И Ю Я
        Е́ Ё́ И́ Ю́ Я́
        е ё и ю я
        е́ ё́ и́ ю́ я́ ;

YaEndings = P L D I Y S ;

Definitions

ReflexiveEnding = [ Т: | т: ] ( ь: | Ь: ) [ С: | с: ] [ Я: | я: ] ;
ReflexiveEnding2 = [ С: | с: ] [ Я: | я: ] ;

Rules
!! ============================================================================
"Rule 00a: Soften consonants before 'soft' vowels and ь (excluding { Ж ж Ц ц Ш ш Ч ч Щ щ Й й })"
0:' <=> [CNoSoftHard: - [ Т: | т: | С: | с: ]] _ [ SoftV: | ь: | Ь: ] ;
        [ Т: | т: ] _ [ ь: | Ь: ] [: - [ С: | с: ]] ;
        [ Т: | т: ] _ [ SoftV: ] ;
        [: - [ Т: | т: ]] [ ь: | Ь: ] [ С: | с: ] _ [ SoftV: | ь: | Ь: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 21: Conversion of { т } in endings { тся } to { ц }"
Vx:Vy <=> _ ( Ь: | ь: ) [ С: | с: ] ;
where Vx in ( Т т )
      Vy in ( Ц ц )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 22: Conversion of { с } in endings { тся } to { 0 }"
Vx:Vy <=> [ т:ц | Т:Ц ] ( Ь: | ь: ) _ ;
where Vx in ( С с )
      Vy in ( 0 0 )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 13: Voice Assimilation: Final devoicing"
Cx:Cy <=> _ [ :' | :0 ]* [ G: | YaEndings: ]* .#. ;
where Cx in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
      Cy in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 14: Unvoiced Assimilation: Consonant clusters with unvoiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ [ :' | :0 ]* :UnvoicedPairedC ;
where Cx in ( Б б В в Г г Д д Ж ж З з )
      Cy in ( П п Ф ф К к Т т Ш ш С с )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 15a: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ [ :' | :0 ]* :VoicedPairedCNoB ;
where Cx in ( П п Ф ф К к Ш ш )
      Cy in ( Б б В в Г г Ж ж )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 15b: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=>  _ ( :' ) ( Ь:0 | ь:0 ) [:VoicedPairedCNoB - [ С: | с: ]] ;
where Cx in ( Т т )
      Cy in ( Д д )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 15c: Voice Assimilation: Consonant clusters with voiced consonant at end of the cluster"
Cx:Cy <=> .#. [:* - [:* [ Т: | т: ]]] ( :' ) ( Ь:0 | ь:0 ) _ ( :' ) ( Ь:0 | ь:0 ) :VoicedPairedCNoB ;
where Cx in ( С с )
      Cy in ( З з )
  matched ;




!This is garbage for spacing
